Mississippi, session 2026, SB2766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Friday before Memorial Day of each year is designated as "Buddy Poppy Day" in Mississippi to recognize the official memorial flower of the Veterans of Foreign Wars (VFW) which honors fallen service members. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.